apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਕੁੱਝ__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="ਪਰ__post">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="ਬਾਤ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਨਦੀ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ਆ</l><r>ਆ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਏ</l><r>ਆ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਏ</l><r>ਆ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r>ਆ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਰਾਜ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਬਾਰ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਰਂਗ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਕਾਨ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨਾਂ</l><r>ਾਨ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨਾਂ</l><r>ਾਨ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੀਵੀ/ਂ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਦੁਨੀਆ/ਂ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਲੋਕ/ੀ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->      
    <pardef n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="int__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rel__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->     

    <e lm="ਕਾ"><i>ਕਾ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="'ਚ"><i>'ਚ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨੀਚੇ"><i>ਨੀਚੇ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੋਲੋਂ"><i>ਕੋਲੋਂ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਲ"><i>ਵਲ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨੂੰ"><i>ਨੂੰ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰਤਿ"><i>ਪ੍ਰਤਿ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਿਆਸਤ"><i>ਸਿਆਸਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਿਰਤੂ"><i>ਮਿਰਤੂ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਿਫ਼ਾਇਤ"><i>ਕਿਫ਼ਾਇਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਰਚ"><i>ਮਰਚ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਿਸ"><i>ਦਿਸ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਨਿਆਨ"><i>ਬਨਿਆਨ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਂਗੀ"><i>ਤਂਗੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟੈਕਸੀ"><i>ਟੈਕਸੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਾਂਦਗੀ"><i>ਮਾਂਦਗੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੂਤਣੀ"><i>ਤੂਤਣੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਫਿਣਸੀ"><i>ਫਿਣਸੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਡਿਊਟੀ"><i>ਡਿਊਟੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਰਚਾ"><i>ਚਰਚਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਾਂ"><i>ਮਾਂ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਲੋਚਨਾ"><i>ਆਲੋਚਨਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਟਕਾ"><i>ਅਟਕਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿਚਾਰਧਾਰਾ"><i>ਵਿਚਾਰਧਾਰਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੱਤਾ"><i>ਸੱਤਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਿਸਮ"><i>ਜਿਸਮ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਹਿਬ"><i>ਸਾਹਿਬ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਮਾਜ"><i>ਸਮਾਜ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਤ"><i>ਰਾਤ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਰਦ"><i>ਦਰਦ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਪੀਰ"><i>ਸਪੀਰ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੇਜਲ"><i>ਸੇਜਲ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭਨ੍ਨ"><i>ਭਨ੍ਨ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਰਤਕ"><i>ਨਰਤਕ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰਸ਼ਾਸਕ"><i>ਪ੍ਰਸ਼ਾਸਕ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਿਜ੍ਜ"><i>ਬਿਜ੍ਜ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਰਟਸ"><i>ਆਰਟਸ</i><par n="ਰਂਗ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਥਿਰਾਂਕ"><i>ਸਥਿਰਾਂਕ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਵਤਾਰਵਾਦ"><i>ਅਵਤਾਰਵਾਦ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਮੂਨੀਆ"><i>ਨਮੂਨੀਆ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਖ ਭਾਵ"><i>ਪਖ<b/>ਭਾਵ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰੇਸ਼ਮ"><i>ਰੇਸ਼ਮ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਂਡਣ"><i>ਮਂਡਣ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੜ੍ਹਾਈ"><i>ਪੜ੍ਹਾਈ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਲੈਕਟ੍ਰੋਮੈਗਨੈਟਿਕ"><i>ਇਲੈਕਟ੍ਰੋਮੈਗਨੈਟਿਕ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜੀਓਮੈਟਰੀ"><i>ਜੀਓਮੈਟਰੀ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬੋਲਚਾਲ"><i>ਬੋਲਚਾਲ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਾਇਦਾਦ"><i>ਜਾਇਦਾਦ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭਾਈ"><i>ਭਾਈ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਾਕਿਸਤਾਨੀ"><i>ਪਾਕਿਸਤਾਨੀ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਾਂਡੂ"><i>ਪਾਂਡੂ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟਾਪੂ"><i>ਟਾਪੂ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਨਮਸਾਖੀ"><i>ਜਨਮਸਾਖੀ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਬਾਦੀ"><i>ਅਬਾਦੀ</i><par n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਗਵਾਈ"><i>ਅਗਵਾਈ</i><par n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਥਿਊਰੀ"><i>ਥਿਊਰੀ</i><par n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿਓਂਤਬੰਦੀ"><i>ਵਿਓਂਤਬੰਦੀ</i><par n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖੋਜੀ"><i>ਖੋਜੀ</i><par n="ਜਾਣਕਾਰੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੁਂਡਾ"><i>ਮੁਂਡ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਨੜਾ"><i>ਬਨੜ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਜ਼ਿਂਦਾ"><i>ਸਾਜ਼ਿਂਦ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟੇਪਾ"><i>ਟੇਪ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੌਕਾ"><i>ਮੌਕ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੁਂੜ੍ਹਂਗਾ"><i>ਮੁਂੜ੍ਹਂਗਾ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਜ ਮਾਲੀਆ"><i>ਰਾਜ<b/>ਮਾਲੀਆ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਮਾਨਤਾ"><i>ਸਮਾਨਤਾ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੇਵਾ"><i>ਸੇਵਾ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਿਰਮਾਤਾ"><i>ਨਿਰਮਾਤਾ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਲੰਘਣਾ"><i>ਉਲੰਘਣਾ</i><par n="ਪਿਤਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਕੀਆ"><i>ਤਕੀ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟਸੂਆ"><i>ਟਸੂ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੁਰਲੀਆ"><i>ਦੁਰਲੀ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਾਰਵਾਕੀਆ"><i>ਚਾਰਵਾਕੀਆ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰੁਪਿਆ"><i>ਰੁਪਿ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿਸ਼ਵ ਵਿਦਿਆਲਾ"><i>ਵਿਸ਼ਵ<b/>ਵਿਦਿਆਲਾ</i><par n="ਡਾਕੀ/ਆ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਾਨ"><i>ਕ</i><par n="ਕਾਨ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੁਨੀਆਂ"><i>ਦੁਨੀਆ</i><par n="ਦੁਨੀਆ/ਂ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੀਵੀਂ"><i>ਤੀਵੀ</i><par n="ਤੀਵੀ/ਂ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਲੋਕੀ"><i>ਲੋਕ</i><par n="ਲੋਕ/ੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੁੱਝ"><i>ਕੁੱਝ</i><par n="ਕੁੱਝ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਿੱਥੇ"><i>ਜਿੱਥੇ</i><par n="rel__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਿਥੇ"><i>ਜਿਥੇ</i><par n="rel__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਹਾਂ"><i>ਕਹਾਂ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਿਉਂ"><i>ਕਿਉਂ</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਧਰ"><i>ਇਧਰ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੋਬਤੀ"><i>ਸੋਬਤੀ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੰਜੋਗ ਨਾਲ"><i>ਸੰਜੋਗ<b/>ਨਾਲ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਤਫਾਕਨ"><i>ਇਤਫਾਕਨ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
